Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2802
Religious association; vesting of property; application; notice; transfer of property.

Upon the application to the district court for the county where such religious association was located, as provided in section 21-2801, by any officer, director, or trustee of the body in which such property is to vest as aforesaid, the court shall appoint a time for hearing the application. Three weeks' published and posted notice thereof shall be given, and any additional notice which the court may direct. Such notice shall direct all interested persons to appear on the date of such hearing and make their objections thereto, if any they have, and it shall be published in a newspaper published in whole or in part within such county or, if there is no such newspaper, in a newspaper published within this state and of general circulation within such county, as directed by the court. The posted notice shall be in three prominent public places within the county where such property is located. If, upon hearing, it appears that a proper case exists under section 21-2801, the court shall adjudge and direct a transfer of such property to be made through a trustee appointed by it for that purpose. Affidavits of the publishing and posting of the notice may be filed in the proceedings, and they shall be evidence in all actions and proceedings in the courts of this state.

Laws 1967, c. 105, § 19, p. 334;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 21-1994.